Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.04.010

Title, effective date, application, severability, captions.

(1) This title shall be known and may be cited as the Washington Criminal Code and shall become effective on July 1, 1976.

(2) The provisions of this title shall apply to any offense committed on or after July 1, 1976, which is defined in this title or the general statutes, unless otherwise expressly provided or unless the context otherwise requires, and shall also apply to any defense to prosecution for such an offense.

(3) The provisions of this title do not apply to or govern the construction of and punishment for any offense committed prior to July 1, 1976, or to the construction and application of any defense to a prosecution for such an offense. Such an offense must be construed and punished according to the provisions of law existing at the time of the commission thereof in the same manner as if this title had not been enacted.

(4) If any provision of this title, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the title, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected, and to this end the provisions of this title are declared to be severable.

(5) Chapter, section, and subsection captions are for organizational purposes only and shall not be construed as part of this title.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.04.010.]

NOTES:

Legislative direction for codification—1975 1st ex.s. c 260: "The provisions of this act shall constitute a new Title in the Revised Code of Washington to be designated as Title 9A RCW." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.92.900.]